test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_I_mitigwaab_gt-norm.yaml
     #Isolation form
     mitigwaab: mitigwaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     +Px1mitigwaab: nimitigwaab
     +Px2mitigwaab: gimitigwaab
     +Px3mitigwaab: omitigwaab
     +PxIndefmitigwaab: imitigwaab
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mitigwaab+Con: mitigwaabenh
     mitigwaab+Dim: mitigwaabens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     mitigwaab+Pos: mitigwaabim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mitigwaab+Pej: mitigwaabish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabinaan
     mitigwaab+PosObv: mitigwaabini
     mitigwaab+PosPl: mitigwaabiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mitigwaab+Pret: mitigwaabiban
     mitigwaab+VocPl: mitigwaab***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mitigwaab+Loc: mitigwaabing
     mitigwaab+Obv: mitigwaaban
     mitigwaab+Pl: mitigwaabag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con: nimitigwaabenh
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim: nimitigwaabens
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con: gimitigwaabenh
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim: gimitigwaabens
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con: omitigwaabenh
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim: omitigwaabens
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con: imitigwaabenh
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim: imitigwaabens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos: nimitigwaabim
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos: gimitigwaabim
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos: omitigwaabim
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos: imitigwaabim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pej: nimitigwaabish
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pej: gimitigwaabish
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pej: omitigwaabish
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pej: imitigwaabish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos1Pl: nimitigwaabinaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+PosObv: nimitigwaabini
     +Px1mitigwaab+PosPl: nimitigwaabiwaa
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos1Pl: gimitigwaabinaan
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosObv: gimitigwaabini
     +Px2mitigwaab+PosPl: gimitigwaabiwaa
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos1Pl: omitigwaabinaan
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosObv: omitigwaabini
     +Px3mitigwaab+PosPl: omitigwaabiwaa
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos1Pl: imitigwaabinaan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosObv: imitigwaabini
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+PosPl: imitigwaabiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pret: nimitigwaabiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+VocPl: nimitigwaab***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pret: gimitigwaabiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+VocPl: gimitigwaab***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pret: omitigwaabiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+VocPl: omitigwaab***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pret: imitigwaabiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+VocPl: imitigwaab***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     +Px1mitigwaab+Loc: nimitigwaabing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Obv: nimitigwaaban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pl: nimitigwaabag
     +Px2mitigwaab+Loc: gimitigwaabing
     +Px2mitigwaab+Obv: gimitigwaaban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pl: gimitigwaabag
     +Px3mitigwaab+Loc: omitigwaabing
     +Px3mitigwaab+Obv: omitigwaaban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pl: omitigwaabag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Loc: imitigwaabing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Obv: imitigwaaban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pl: imitigwaabag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos: mitigwaabenhim
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos: mitigwaabensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mitigwaab+Con+Pej: mitigwaabenhish
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pej: mitigwaabensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5
     mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabenhinaan
     mitigwaab+Con+PosObv: mitigwaabenhini
     mitigwaab+Con+PosPl: mitigwaabenhiwaa
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabensinaan
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv: mitigwaabensini
     mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl: mitigwaabensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mitigwaab+Con+Pret: mitigwaabenhiban
     mitigwaab+Con+VocPl: mitigwaabenh***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pret: mitigwaabensiban
     mitigwaab+Dim+VocPl: mitigwaabens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mitigwaab+Con+Loc: mitigwaabenhing
     mitigwaab+Con+Obv: mitigwaabenhan
     mitigwaab+Con+Pl: mitigwaabenhag
     mitigwaab+Dim+Loc: mitigwaabensing
     mitigwaab+Dim+Obv: mitigwaabensan
     mitigwaab+Dim+Pl: mitigwaabensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pej: mitigwaabimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabiminaan
     mitigwaab+Pos+PosObv: mitigwaabimini
     mitigwaab+Pos+PosPl: mitigwaabimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 6
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pret: mitigwaabimiban
     mitigwaab+Pos+VocPl: mitigwaabim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 7
     mitigwaab+Pos+Loc: mitigwaabiming
     mitigwaab+Pos+Obv: mitigwaabiman
     mitigwaab+Pos+Pl: mitigwaabimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5
     mitigwaab+Pej+Pos1Pl: mitigwaabishinaan
     mitigwaab+Pej+PosObv: mitigwaabishini
     mitigwaab+Pej+PosPl: mitigwaabishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mitigwaab+Pej+Pret: mitigwaabishiban
     mitigwaab+Pej+VocPl: mitigwaabish***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mitigwaab+Pej+Loc: mitigwaabishing
     mitigwaab+Pej+Obv: mitigwaabishan
     mitigwaab+Pej+Pl: mitigwaabishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 6
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pret: mitigwaabinaaniban
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+VocPl: mitigwaabinaan***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+PosObv+Pret: mitigwaabiniiban
     mitigwaab+PosObv+VocPl: mitigwaabini***idig, idog***
     mitigwaab+PosPl+Pret: mitigwaabiwaaiban
     mitigwaab+PosPl+VocPl: mitigwaabiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 5, 7
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Loc: mitigwaabinaaning
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Obv: mitigwaabinaanan
     mitigwaab+Pos1Pl+Pl: mitigwaabinaanag
     mitigwaab+PosObv+Loc: mitigwaabiniing
     mitigwaab+PosObv+Obv: mitigwaabinian
     mitigwaab+PosObv+Pl: mitigwaabiniag
     mitigwaab+PosPl+Loc: mitigwaabiwaaing
     mitigwaab+PosPl+Obv: mitigwaabiwaaan
     mitigwaab+PosPl+Pl: mitigwaabiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mitigwaab+Pret+Loc: mitigwaabibaning
     mitigwaab+Pret+Obv: mitigwaabibanan
     mitigwaab+Pret+Pl: mitigwaabibanag
     mitigwaab+VocPl+Loc: mitigwaab***idig, idog***ing
     mitigwaab+VocPl+Obv: mitigwaab***idig, idog***an
     mitigwaab+VocPl+Pl: mitigwaab***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos: nimitigwaabenhim
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos: nimitigwaabensim
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos: gimitigwaabenhim
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos: gimitigwaabensim
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos: omitigwaabenhim
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos: omitigwaabensim
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos: imitigwaabenhim
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos: imitigwaabensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pej: nimitigwaabenhish
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pej: nimitigwaabensish
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pej: gimitigwaabenhish
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pej: gimitigwaabensish
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pej: omitigwaabenhish
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pej: omitigwaabensish
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pej: imitigwaabenhish
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pej: imitigwaabensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl: nimitigwaabenhinaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+PosObv: nimitigwaabenhini
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+PosPl: nimitigwaabenhiwaa
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl: nimitigwaabensinaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv: nimitigwaabensini
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl: nimitigwaabensiwaa
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl: gimitigwaabenhinaan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+PosObv: gimitigwaabenhini
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+PosPl: gimitigwaabenhiwaa
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl: gimitigwaabensinaan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv: gimitigwaabensini
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl: gimitigwaabensiwaa
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl: omitigwaabenhinaan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+PosObv: omitigwaabenhini
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+PosPl: omitigwaabenhiwaa
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl: omitigwaabensinaan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+PosObv: omitigwaabensini
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+PosPl: omitigwaabensiwaa
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pos1Pl: imitigwaabenhinaan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+PosObv: imitigwaabenhini
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+PosPl: imitigwaabenhiwaa
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pos1Pl: imitigwaabensinaan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+PosObv: imitigwaabensini
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+PosPl: imitigwaabensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pret: nimitigwaabenhiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+VocPl: nimitigwaabenh***idig, idog***
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pret: nimitigwaabensiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+VocPl: nimitigwaabens***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pret: gimitigwaabenhiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+VocPl: gimitigwaabenh***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pret: gimitigwaabensiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+VocPl: gimitigwaabens***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pret: omitigwaabenhiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+VocPl: omitigwaabenh***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pret: omitigwaabensiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+VocPl: omitigwaabens***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pret: imitigwaabenhiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+VocPl: imitigwaabenh***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pret: imitigwaabensiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+VocPl: imitigwaabens***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Loc: nimitigwaabenhing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Obv: nimitigwaabenhan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Con+Pl: nimitigwaabenhag
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Loc: nimitigwaabensing
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Obv: nimitigwaabensan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Dim+Pl: nimitigwaabensag
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Loc: gimitigwaabenhing
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Obv: gimitigwaabenhan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Con+Pl: gimitigwaabenhag
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Loc: gimitigwaabensing
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Obv: gimitigwaabensan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Dim+Pl: gimitigwaabensag
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Loc: omitigwaabenhing
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Obv: omitigwaabenhan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Con+Pl: omitigwaabenhag
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Loc: omitigwaabensing
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Obv: omitigwaabensan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Dim+Pl: omitigwaabensag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Loc: imitigwaabenhing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Obv: imitigwaabenhan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Con+Pl: imitigwaabenhag
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Loc: imitigwaabensing
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Obv: imitigwaabensan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Dim+Pl: imitigwaabensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+Pej: nimitigwaabimish
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+Pej: gimitigwaabimish
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+Pej: omitigwaabimish
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+Pej: imitigwaabimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+Pos1Pl: nimitigwaabiminaan
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+PosObv: nimitigwaabimini
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+PosPl: nimitigwaabimiwaa
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+Pos1Pl: gimitigwaabiminaan
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+PosObv: gimitigwaabimini
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+PosPl: gimitigwaabimiwaa
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+Pos1Pl: omitigwaabiminaan
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+PosObv: omitigwaabimini
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+PosPl: omitigwaabimiwaa
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+Pos1Pl: imitigwaabiminaan
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+PosObv: imitigwaabimini
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+PosPl: imitigwaabimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+Pret: nimitigwaabimiban
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+VocPl: nimitigwaabim***idig, idog***
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+Pret: gimitigwaabimiban
     +Px2mitigwaab+Pos+VocPl: gimitigwaabim***idig, idog***
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+Pret: omitigwaabimiban
     +Px3mitigwaab+Pos+VocPl: omitigwaabim***idig, idog***
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+Pret: imitigwaabimiban
     +PxIndefmitigwaab+Pos+VocPl: imitigwaabim***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     +Px1mitigwaab+Pos+Loc: nimitigwaabiming
